Illinois, session 104th, HB1595.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Section 7.3 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/7.3)7    Sec. 7.3. Duty to post information pertaining to benefits 8offered through the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund.9    (a) Within 6 business days after an employer participating 10in the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund approves a budget, 11that employer must post on its website the total compensation 12package for each employee having a total compensation package 13that exceeds $125,000 $75,000 per year. If the employer does 14not maintain a website, the employer must post a physical copy 15of this information at the principal office of the employer. 16If an employer maintains a website, it may choose to post a 17physical copy of this information at the principal office of 18the employer in lieu of posting the information directly on 19the website; however, the employer must post directions on the 20website on how to access that information.21    (b) At least 6 days before an employer participating in 22the Illinois Municipal Retirement Fund approves an employee's 23total compensation package that is equal to or in excess of   HB1595- 2 -LRB104 02977 BDA 12994 b1$200,000 $150,000 per year, the employer must post on its 2website the total compensation package for that employee. If 3the employer does not maintain a website, the employer shall 4post a physical copy of this information at the principal 5office of the employer. If an employer maintains a website, it 6may choose to post a physical copy of this information at the 7principal office of the employer in lieu of posting the 8information directly on the website; however, the employer 9must post directions on the website on how to access that 10information.11    (c) For the purposes of this Section, "total compensation 12package" means payment by the employer to the employee for 13salary, health insurance, a housing allowance, a vehicle 14allowance, a clothing allowance, bonuses, loans, vacation days 15granted, and sick days granted. 16(Source: P.A. 97-609, eff. 1-1-12.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 181, 2026.